New York, session 2025-2026, A4308.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of education of the state of New York 2 shall conduct a comprehensive study analyzing the sufficiency of current 3 education aid apportionment formulas, make recommendations for improve- 4 ments to such formulas and deliver a report of such findings and recom- 5 mendations. 6 § 2. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, the following 7 information: 8 (a) an assessment of the impact of the tax cap on increased funding 9 needs; 10 (b) increased costs to each school district; 11 (c) changes in wealth of each district; 12 (d) increased requirements placed on districts through state mandates, 13 including the implementation of higher learning standards and testing; 14 (e) recommendations for new aid apportionment formulas; and 15 (f) any additional information the commissioner of education deems 16 pertinent for the purposes of this act. 17 § 3. For the purposes of this act, the commissioner of education may 18 conduct such study in conjunction with any other department, division, 19 board, bureau, commission, agency, or public authority of the state 20 deemed necessary. To the maximum extent feasible, such commissioner 21 shall be authorized to request, receive, and utilize such resources and 22 data of any other department, division, board, bureau, commission, agen- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03503-01-5 A. 4308 2 1 cy, or public authority of the state as they may reasonably request to 2 properly carry their powers and duties pursuant to this act. 3 § 4. The commissioner of education shall deliver such report to the 4 governor, the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the 5 assembly, the chair of the senate committee on education and the chair 6 of the assembly committee on education no later than December 31, 2026. 7 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 8 deemed repealed January 1, 2027.